Illinois, session 104th, HB226.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Consumer Fraud and Deceptive Business 5Practices Act is amended by adding Section 2HHHH as follows: 6    (815 ILCS 505/2HHHH new)7    Sec. 2HHHH. Home warranty plans. It is an unlawful 8practice within the meaning of this Act for any company to send 9or cause to be sent to a person in this State a notice that a 10home warranty plan is expiring that includes a request for a 11one-time payment or subscription if the person does not have a 12current home warranty plan with the company.